District of Columbia statutes.
4-413

Monitoring day care services; publication of procedures; compliance with federal regulations.

(a)

The Department shall be responsible for monitoring the provision of day care services to assure that adequate services are provided to the children and that contractual and other agreements are met.

(b)

The Department shall develop and publish procedures that will assure that any licensed child development center or home in the District of Columbia can apply to provide day care services to eligible children.

(c)

Child development facilities contracting or agreeing with the Department to provide day care, which are included in the programs for federal reimbursement, shall comply with all applicable federal regulations and requirements.

(d)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 14, 26 DCR 20
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5182, 53 DCR 6899

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-313.
1973 Ed., § 3-313.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-192 added subsec. (d).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Day Care Grant-Making and Rulemaking Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-156, September 19, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 7928).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Day Care Grant-Making and Rulemaking Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-380, May 19, 2006, 53 DCR 4405).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5182 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5182 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5182 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).

Short Title

Short title: Section 5181 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle L of title V of the act may be cited as the “Day Care Improvement Amendment Act of 2006”.